en: Scrub Brushes
xx: Scrub Brushes
cs: Čisticí kartáče
da: Gulvskrubber
de: Scheuerbürsten
es: Cepillos frotadores
fr: Brosses lave-pont
it: Spazzole
ja: たわし・ブラシ
nl: Boenders
no: Skrubber
pl: Szczotki do szorowania
pt: Escovas de limpeza
ru: Скребковые щётки
sv: Skurborstar
tr: Tahta Fırçaları

en: Shop Towels & General-Purpose Cleaning Cloths
xx: Shop Towels & General-Purpose Cleaning Cloths
cs: Utěrky a ručníky
da: Værkstedsklude
de: Reinigungstücher
es: Toallas para talleres
fr: Essuie-touts
it: Asciugamani lavabili o monouso
ja: ショップタオル
nl: Schoonmaakdoekjes
no: Industritørk
pl: Ręczniki jednorazowe
pt: Panos de limpeza
ru: Технические салфетки
sv: Verkstadstorkdukar
tr: El Havluları

en: Sponges & Scouring Pads
xx: Sponges & Scouring Pads
cs: Houby a drátěnky
da: Svampe og grydesvampe
de: Schwämme & Topfreiniger
es: Esponjas y estropajos
fr: Éponges et grattoirs
it: Spugne e spugne abrasive
ja: スポンジ・たわし
nl: Sponzen en schuursponzen
no: Svamper og skureputer
pl: Gąbki i zmywaki do szorowania
pt: Esponjas e esfregões de polir
ru: Губки
sv: Tvättsvampar och skurdynor
tr: Süngerler ve Ovma Bezleri

en: Household sponges
de: Haushaltsschwämme
es: Esponjas domésticas
fr: Éponges ménagères

en: Squeegees
xx: Squeegees
cs: Stěrky
da: Gummiskrabere
de: Abzieher
es: Limpiacristales
fr: Raclette-éponge
it: Lavavetri
ja: スクイジー・ワイパー
nl: Vloertrekker
no: Naler
pl: Ściągaczki do szyb i okien
pt: Rodos
ru: Щётки для мытья окон
sv: Gummiskrapor
tr: Çekçekler

en: Household Paper Products
xx: Household Paper Products
cs: Papírové výrobky pro domácnost
da: Husholdningspapir
de: Hygienepapiere
es: Productos de papel para el hogar
fr: Produits en papier pour la maison
it: Prodotti per la casa
ja: 家庭用紙製品
nl: Papieren huishoudelijke artikelen
no: Husholdningspapir
pl: Produkty papierowe do gospodarstwa domowego
pt: Produtos domésticos de papel
ru: Бытовые бумажные изделия
sv: Pappersprodukter för hemmet
tr: Ev Kağıt Ürünleri

en: Facial Tissues
xx: Facial Tissues
cs: Odličovací ubrousky
da: Ansigtsservietter
de: Papiertaschentücher
es: Pañuelos faciales
fr: Mouchoirs en papier
it: Fazzoletti per il viso
ja: ティッシュペーパー
nl: Gezichtsdoekjes
no: Ansiktsservietter
pl: Chusteczki higieniczne
pt: Lenços para o rosto
ru: Салфетки для лица
sv: Pappersnäsdukar
tr: Kağıt Mendiller

en: Paper Napkins
xx: Paper Napkins
cs: Papírové ubrousky
da: Papirservietter
de: Papierservietten
es: Servilletas de papel
fr: Serviettes de table en papier
it: Fazzoletti di carta
ja: 紙ナプキン
nl: Papieren servetten
no: Papirservietter
pl: Serwetki papierowe
pt: Guardanapos de papel
ru: Бумажные салфетки
sv: Pappersservetter
tr: Kağıt Peçeteler

en: Paper Towels
xx: Paper Towels
cs: Papírové ručníky
da: Køkkenruller
de: Küchenrollen & Papierhandtücher
es: Toallas de papel
fr: Serviettes en papier
it: Carta assorbente
ja: ペーパータオル
nl: Papieren handdoekjes
no: Papirhåndklær
pl: Ręczniki papierowe
pt: Toalhas de papel
ru: Бумажные полотенца
sv: Pappershanddukar
tr: Kağıt Havlular

en: Toilet papers, toilet tissues, toilet rolls
xx: Toilet Paper
ar: ورق التواليت ، لفات ورق التواليت
as: শৌচাগাৰৰ কাগজ, শৌচাগাৰৰ ৰোল
az: Tualet kağızı, tualet rulonları
be: Туалетная папера, туалетныя рулоны
bg: Тоалетна хартия, ролки тоалетна хартия
bn: টয়লেট পেপার, টয়লেট রোল
cs: Toaletní papír, role toaletního papíru
da: Toiletpapir, toiletpapirruller
de: Toilettenpapier, Toilettenrollen
el: Χαρτί υγείας, ρολά χαρτιού υγείας
es: Papel higiénico, rollos de papel higiénico
et: Tualettpaber, tualettpaberi rullid
fa: کاغذ توالت، رول کاغذ توالت
fi: WC-paperi, WC-paperirullat
fr: Papiers toilette, papier toilette, papier hygiénique, papiers hygiéniques
ga: Páipéar leithris, rollaí páipéir leithris
gu: ટોઇલેટ પેપર, ટોઇલેટ રોલ
hi: टॉयलेट पेपर, टॉयलेट रोल
hr: Toaletni papir, role toaletnog papira
hu: WC-papír, WC-papírtekercsek
hy: Զուգարանի թուղթ, զուգարանի թղթի գլանակներ
id: Kertas toilet, gulungan kertas toilet
is: Klósettpappír, klósettpappírsrúllur
it: Carta igienica, rotoli di carta igienica
ja: トイレットペーパー、トイレットロール
jw: Kertas jamban, gulungan kertas jamban
ka: ტუალეტის ქაღალდი, ტუალეტის რულონები
kk: Дәретхана қағазы, дәретхана қағазының орамдары
km: ក្រដាសបង្គន់, ក្រដាសបង្គន់
kn: ಶೌಚಾಲಯ ಕಾಗದ, ಶೌಚಾಲಯ ರೋಲ್ಗಳು
ko: 화장지, 화장지 롤
ky: Даараткана кагазы, даараткана кагазынын түрмөктөрү
lt: Tualetinis popierius, tualetinio popieriaus ritinėliai
lv: Tualetes papīrs, tualetes papīra ruļļi
mk: Тоалетна хартија, ролни тоалетна хартија
ml: ടോയ്‌ലറ്റ് പേപ്പർ, ടോയ്‌ലറ്റ് റോളുകൾ
mn: Ариун цэврийн цаас, ариун цэврийн цаасны ороомог
mr: टॉयलेट पेपर, टॉयलेट रोल
ms: Kertas tandas, gulungan kertas tandas
mt: Karta tat-twaletta, rollijiet tal-karta tat-twaletta
my: အိမ်သာသုံးစက္ကူ၊ အိမ်သာသုံးလိပ်များ
ne: ट्वाइलेट पेपर, ट्वाइलेट रोलहरू
nl: Toiletpapier, wc-rollen
no: Toalettpapir, toalettpapirruller
or: ଟଏଲେଟ୍ ପେପର, ଟଏଲେଟ୍ ରୋଲ୍
pa: ਟਾਇਲਟ ਪੇਪਰ, ਟਾਇਲਟ ਰੋਲ
pl: Papier toaletowy, rolki papieru toaletowego
ps: تشناب کاغذونه، تشناب رولونه
pt: Papel higiénico, rolos de papel higiênico
ro: Hârtie igienică, role de hârtie igienică
ru: Туалетная бумага, туалетные рулоны
sd: ٽوائلٽ پيپر، ٽوائلٽ رول
si: වැසිකිලි කඩදාසි, වැසිකිලි රෝල්
sk: Toaletný papier, rolky toaletného papiera
sl: Toaletni papir, zvitki toaletnega papirja
so: Warqadaha musqusha, duubka warqadaha musqusha
sq: Letër higjienike, rrotulla letre higjienike
sr: Тоалет папир, ролне тоалет папира
sv: Toalettpapper, toalettpappersrullar
sw: Karatasi za choo, roll za karatasi za choo
ta: கழிப்பறை காகிதம், கழிப்பறை சுருள்கள்
te: టాయిలెట్ పేపర్, టాయిలెట్ రోల్స్
tg: Коғази ҳоҷатхона, ғелоқҳои коғази ҳоҷатхона
th: กระดาษชำระ, กระดาษชำระม้วน
tk: Hajathana kagyzlary, hajathana kagyzlarynyň rulonlary
tl: Papel de banyo, rolyo ng papel de banyo
tr: Tuvalet kağıdı, tuvalet rulosu
uk: Туалетний папір, рулони туалетного паперу
ur: ٹوائلٹ پیپر، ٹوائلٹ رولز
uz: Hojatxona qog'ozi, hojatxona qog'ozi rulonlari
vi: Giấy vệ sinh, cuộn giấy vệ sinh
xh: Amaphepha angasese, imiqulu yamaphepha angasese
yo: Iwe ile-igbọnsẹ, awọn yipo iwe ile-igbọnsẹ
zh: 卫生纸，卫生卷纸
zu: Amaphepha angasese, imiqulu yephepha langasese

en: Household Thermometers
xx: Household Thermometers
cs: Domácí teploměry
da: Husholdningstermometre
de: Haushaltsthermometer
es: Termómetros para la casa
fr: Thermomètres domestiques, Thermomètre digital
it: Termometri per la casa
ja: 家庭用温度計
nl: Huishoudelijke thermometers
no: Husholdningstermometre
pl: Termometry domowe
pt: Termômetros domésticos
ru: Бытовые термометры
sv: Termometrar för hemmet
tr: Ev Termometreleri

en: Laundry Supplies, Laundry products
xx: Laundry Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro praní
da: Vaskemidler
de: Wäschepflege
es: Productos para lavado de ropa
fr: Produits de blanchisserie
it: Forniture lavanderia
ja: 洗濯用品
nl: Wasbenodigdheden
no: Klesvask-utstyr
pl: Artykuły do pralni
pt: Suprimentos de lavandeira
ru: Товары для стирки
sv: Tvättutrustning
tr: Çamaşırhane Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Bleach
xx: Bleach
ar: مبيض
as: ব্লিচ
az: Ağardıcı
be: Адбельвальнік
bg: Белина
bn: ব্লিচ
cs: Bělidlo
da: Blegemiddel
de: Bleichmittel
el: Χλωρίνη
es: Lejía
et: Valgendi
fa: سفید کننده
fi: Valkaisuaine
fr: Eau de Javel
ga: Tuarthóir
gu: બ્લીચ
hi: ब्लीच
hr: Izbjeljivač
hu: Fehérítő
hy: Սպիտակեցնող միջոց
id: Pemutih
is: Bleikja
it: Candeggina
ja: 漂白剤
jw: Pemutih
ka: მათეთრებელი
kk: Ағартқыш
km: ទឹកសាប៊ូ
kn: బ్లీಚ್
ko: 표백제
ky: Агартуучу
lt: Baliklis
lv: Balinātājs
mk: Белило
ml: ബ്ലീച്ച്
mn: Цайруулагч
mr: ब्लीच
ms: Peluntur
mt: Bliċ
my: အရောင်ချွတ်ဆေး
ne: ब्लीच
nl: Bleekmiddel
no: Blekemiddel
or: ବ୍ଲିଚ୍
pa: ਬਲੀਚ
pl: Wybielacz
ps: بلیچ
pt: Lixívia, Água sanitária
ro: Înălbitor
ru: Отбеливатель
sd: بلچ
si: විරංජන
sk: Bielidlo
sl: Belilo
so: Daawada caddeysa
sq: Zbardhues
sr: Избељивач
sv: Blekmedel
sw: Blechi
ta: ப்ளீச்
te: బ్లీచ్
tg: Сафедкунанда
th: สารฟอกขาว
tk: Agardyjy
tl: Paputi
tr: Çamaşır suyu
uk: Відбілювач
ur: بلیچ
uz: Oqartiruvchi
vi: Thuốc tẩy
xh: I-bleach
yo: Bilisi
zh: 漂白剂
zu: I-bleach

en: Clothespins
xx: Clothespins
cs: Kolíčky na prádlo
da: Tørreklemmer
de: Wäscheklammern
es: Pinzas de la ropa
fr: Pinces à linge
it: Mollette
ja: 洗濯バサミ
nl: Wasknijpers
no: Klesklyper
pl: Klamerki do bielizny
pt: Pregadores
ru: Бельевые прищепки
sv: Klädnypor
tr: Mandallar

en: Dry Cleaning Kits
xx: Dry Cleaning Kits
cs: Sady na chemické čištění oděvů
da: Renserisæt
de: Trockenreinigungssets
es: Kits de limpieza en seco
fr: Kits de nettoyage à sec
it: Kit per pulizia a secco
ja: ドライクリーニングキット
nl: Droogreinigingssets
no: Sett for kjemisk rensing
pl: Zestawy do prania chemicznego
pt: Kits para limpeza a seco
ru: Наборы для химчистки
sv: Kemtvättskit
tr: Kuru Temizleme Setleri

en: Drying Racks & Hangers
xx: Drying Racks & Hangers
cs: Sušáky na prádlo
da: Tørrestativer
de: Wäscheständer
es: Tendederos y perchas
fr: Séchoirs
it: Cestelli di asciugatura
ja: 物干し
nl: Droogrekken
no: Tørkestativer og kleshengere
pl: Suszarki rozkładane
pt: Varais
ru: Сушильные вешалки для одежды
sv: Torkställningar och klädhängare
tr: Kurutma Raf ve Askıları

en: Fabric Refreshers
xx: Fabric Refreshers
cs: Osvěžovače tkanin
da: Tekstil – opfriskning
de: Textilerfrischer
es: Ambientadores para tejidos
fr: Sprays rafraîchissants
it: Rinfrescanti per tessuti
ja: 布用消臭剤
nl: Meubelverfrissers
no: Tøyfriskere
pl: Odświeżacze do tkanin
pt: Desodorizadores de tecido
ru: Освежители ткани
sv: Textilspray för luktborttagning
tr: Kumaş Yenileyiciler

en: Fabric Shavers
xx: Fabric Shavers
cs: Odstraňovače žmolků
da: Tekstil – shaver
de: Fusselrasierer
es: Máquina de afeitar de tela
fr: Rasoirs à vêtements
it: Rasoi per pelucchi
ja: 毛玉取り
nl: Scheerapparaten voor textiel
no: Lofjernere
pl: Golarki do tkanin
pt: Removedor para tecidos
ru: Машинки для удаления катышков
sv: Noppborttagare
tr: Kumaş Sıyırıcılar

en: Fabric Softeners & Dryer Sheets
xx: Fabric Softeners & Dryer Sheets
cs: Změkčovadla a listy do sušiček
da: Tekstil – skyllemidler
de: Weichspüler & Trocknertücher
es: Suavizantes para ropa y toallitas para secadoras
fr: Adoucissants et lingettes pour sèche-linge
it: Ammorbidenti e panni ammorbidenti
ja: 柔軟剤
nl: Wasverzachter en drogerdoekjes
no: Tøymyknere og tørkeark
pl: Zmiękczacze i osuszacze
pt: Amaciantes de tecidos e toalhas amaciantes
ru: Кондиционеры для белья и антистатики
sv: Sköljmedel
tr: Kumaş Yumuşatıcılar ve Kurutma Kağıtları

en: Fabric Stain Removers
xx: Fabric Stain Removers
cs: Odstraňovače skvrn
da: Tekstfil – pletfjernere
de: Fleckenentferner für Stoffe
es: Quitamanchas para tejidos
fr: Détachants tissus
it: Smacchiatori per tessuti
ja: しみ抜き剤
nl: Vlekverwijderaars
no: Flekkfjernere for tøy
pl: Odplamiacze do tkanin
pt: Removedores de manchas de tecidos
ru: Пятновыводители для тканей
sv: Fläckborttagningsmedel för textil
tr: Kumaş Leke Çıkarıcılar